Illinois, session 104th, SB2503.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and adding Section 4.41 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   SB2503 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.41 new)2    Sec. 4.41. Acts repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Acts are repealed on January 1, 2031:4    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.5    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.  6    Section 10. The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act is 7amended by changing Sections 1, 2, 2.1, 3, 3.5, 4.5, 5.1, 5.5, 86, 7.1, 9, 9.1, 9.4, 9.7, 9.8, 10a, 11, 11.5, and 11.8 and by 9adding Sections 2.05, 4.6, and 11.5a as follows: 10    (225 ILCS 335/1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7501)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 1. Legislative purpose. It is hereby declared to be 13the public policy of this State that, in order to safeguard the 14life, health, property, and public welfare of its citizens, 15the business of roofing construction, reconstruction, 16alteration, maintenance and repair is a matter affecting the 17public interest, and any person desiring to obtain a license 18to engage in the business as herein defined shall be required 19to establish the person's his or her qualifications to be 20licensed as herein provided.21(Source: P.A. 90-55, eff. 1-1-98.) 22    (225 ILCS 335/2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7502)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2503 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 2context otherwise requires:3    (a) "Licensure" means the act of obtaining or holding a 4license issued by the Department as provided in this Act.5    (b) "Department" means the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation.7    (c) "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 8Professional Regulation or his or her designee.9    (d) "Person" means any individual, partnership, 10corporation, business trust, professional limited liability 11company, limited liability company, or other legal entity.12    (e) "Roofing contractor" is one who has the experience, 13knowledge, and skill to construct, reconstruct, alter, 14maintain, and repair roofs and use materials and items used in 15the construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, and 16repair of all kinds of roofing and waterproofing as related to 17roofing over an occupiable space, all in such manner to comply 18with all plans, specifications, codes, laws, and regulations 19applicable thereto, but does not include such contractor's 20employees to the extent the requirements of Section 3 of this 21Act apply and extend to such employees. "Roofing contractor" 22includes a corporation, professional limited liability 23company, limited liability company, limited partnership, 24partnership, business trust, or sole proprietorship. 25    (f) "Board" means the Roofing Advisory Board.26    (g) "Qualifying party" means the individual designated by   SB2503 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1a roofing contracting business who is filing for licensure as 2a sole proprietor, partner of a partnership, officer of a 3corporation, trustee of a business trust, or manager of a 4professional limited liability company or limited liability 5company. party of another legal entity, 6    "Qualifying party" means a person who, prior to and upon 7the roofing contractor's licensure, who is legally qualified 8to act for the business organization in all matters connected 9with its roofing contracting business, has the authority to 10supervise roofing installation operations, and is actively 11engaged in day-to-day day to day activities of the business 12organization.13    "Qualifying party" does not apply to a seller of roofing 14services materials or roofing materials services when the 15construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, or 16repair of roofing or waterproofing is to be performed by a 17person other than the seller or the seller's employees.18    (h) "Limited roofing license" means a license made 19available to contractors whose roofing business is limited to 20roofing residential properties consisting of 8 units or less.21    (i) "Unlimited roofing license" means a license made 22available to contractors whose roofing business is unlimited 23in nature and includes roofing on residential, commercial, and 24industrial properties.25    (j) "Seller of roofing services or materials" means a 26business entity primarily engaged in the sale of tangible   SB2503 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1personal property at retail. 2    (k) "Building permit" means a permit issued by a unit of 3local government for work performed within the local 4government's jurisdiction that requires a license under this 5Act. 6    (l) "Address of record" means the designated street 7address recorded by the Department in the applicant's or 8licensee's application file or license file as maintained by 9the Department's licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of 10the applicant or licensee to inform the Department of any 11change of address, and those changes must be made either 12through the Department's website or by contacting the 13Department. 14    (m) "Email address of record" means the designated email 15address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 16application file or the licensee's license file as maintained 17by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 18    (n) "Roof repair" means reconstruction or renewal of any 19portion of an existing roof for the purpose of correcting 20damage or restoring the roof to pre-damage condition, part of 21an existing roof for the purpose of its maintenance but 22excludes circumstances when a torch technique is used by a 23licensed roofing contractor. "Roof repair" includes the use 24of: 25        (1) new material that is compatible with existing 26    materials that are to remain in a specific roof section;   SB2503 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    and2        (2) new material that is at least as fire resistive as 3    the material being replaced.4    (o) "Roofing work" or "professional roofing services" 5means the construction, reconstruction, alteration, 6maintenance, and repair of a roof on residential, commercial, 7or industrial property and the use of materials and items in 8the construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, and 9repair of roofing and waterproofing of roofs, all in a manner 10that complies with plans, specifications, codes, laws, rules, 11regulations, and current roofing industry standards for 12workmanlike performance applicable to the construction, 13reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, and repair of roofs 14on such properties.15    (p) "Seller of roofing services" means a business or 16governmental entity that subcontracts professional roofing 17services to a licensed roofing contractor that serves as the 18subcontractor for a roofing project. "Seller of roofing 19services" includes a general contractor, real estate 20developer, or builder.21    (q) "General contractor", "real estate developer", or 22"builder" means the person responsible for overseeing a 23building or construction project that includes a roof system.24    (r) "Public member" means a consumer who is not a 25qualifying party or employee of a licensed roofing contractor. 26For purposes of board membership, the public member shall have   SB2503 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1no connection or financial interest in the roofing or general 2contracting industries.3    (s) "Subcontractor" means any person who is a licensed 4roofing contractor that has a direct contract with a seller of 5roofing services or a governmental entity to perform a portion 6of roofing work under a building or construction contract for 7a project that includes a roof system.8    (t) "Roof system" means the components of a roof that 9include, but are not limited to, covering, framing, 10insulation, sheathing, ventilation, sealing, waterproofing, 11weatherproofing, related architectural sheet metal work, and 12roof coatings.13    (u) "Roof section" means a separation or division of a 14roof area by existing expansion joints, parapet walls, 15flashing (excluding valley), difference of elevation 16(excluding hips and ridges), roof type, or legal description. 17"Roof section" does not include the roof area required for a 18proper tie-off with an existing system.19    (v) "Roof recover" means installing an additional roof 20covering over a prepared existing roof covering without 21removing the existing roof covering. "Roof recover" does not 22include the following situations:23        (1) if the existing roof covering is water soaked or 24    has deteriorated to the point that the existing roof or 25    roof covering is not adequate as a base for additional 26    roofing;  SB2503 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (2) if the existing roof covering is slate or tile; or2        (3) if the existing roof has 2 or more applications of 3    roof covering unless the Department has received and 4    accepted a structural condition report, prepared by an 5    Illinois licensed architect or structural engineer, 6    confirming that the existing structure can support an 7    additional layer of roof covering.8    (w) "Roof replacement" means removing the existing roof 9covering, repairing any damaged substrate, and installing a 10new roof covering. The new roof shall be installed in 11accordance with the applicable provisions of the Illinois 12Energy Conservation Code. 13(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 100-545, eff. 11-8-17.) 14    (225 ILCS 335/2.05 new)15    Sec. 2.05. Address of record; email address of record. All 16applicants and licensees shall:17        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 18    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 19    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 20    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and21        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 22    record or email address of record within 14 days after the 23    change, either through the Department's website or by 24    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit.   SB2503 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (225 ILCS 335/2.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7502.1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 2.1. Administration of Act; rules and forms.4    (a) The Department shall exercise the powers and duties 5prescribed by the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois for 6the administration of licensing Acts and shall exercise such 7other powers and duties necessary for effectuating the 8purposes of this Act. 9    (b) The Secretary may adopt rules consistent with the 10provisions of this Act for the administration and enforcement 11of this Act and for the payment of fees connected with this Act 12and may prescribe forms that shall be issued in connection 13with this Act. The rules may include, but not be limited to, 14the standards and criteria for licensure and professional 15conduct and discipline and the standards and criteria used 16when determining fitness to practice. The Department may 17consult with the Board in adopting rules.18    (c) The Department may, at any time, seek the advice and 19the expert knowledge of the Board and any member of the Board 20on any matter relating to the administration of this Act.21    (d) (Blank).22(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 23    (225 ILCS 335/3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7503)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)25    Sec. 3. Application for roofing contractor license.   SB2503 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (1) To obtain a license, an applicant must indicate if the 2license is sought for a sole proprietorship, partnership, 3corporation, professional limited liability company, limited 4liability company, business trust, or other legal entity and 5whether the application is for a limited or unlimited roofing 6license. If the license is sought for a sole proprietorship, 7the license shall be issued to the sole proprietor who shall 8also be designated as the qualifying party. If the license is 9sought for a partnership, corporation, professional limited 10liability company, limited liability company, business trust, 11or other legal entity, the license shall be issued in the 12company name. At the time of application for licensure under 13the Act, a A company shall must designate one individual who 14will serve as a qualifying party. The qualifying party is the 15individual who must take the examination required under 16Section 3.5 on behalf of the company, and actively participate 17in the day-to-day operations of the company's business 18following the issuance of licensure. The company shall submit 19an application in writing to the Department on a form 20containing the information prescribed by the Department and 21accompanied by the fee fixed by the Department. The 22application shall include, but shall not be limited to:23        (a) the name and address of the individual person 24    designated as the qualifying party responsible for the 25    practice of professional roofing in Illinois;26        (b) the name of the sole proprietorship and its sole   SB2503 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    proprietor, the name of the partnership and its partners, 2    the name of the corporation and its officers, 3    shareholders, and directors, the name of the business 4    trust and its trustees, or the name of such other legal 5    entity and its members and managers;6        (c) evidence of compliance with any statutory 7    requirements pertaining to such legal entity, including 8    compliance with the Assumed Business Name Act; and9        (d) a signed irrevocable uniform consent to service of 10    process form provided by the Department. 11    (1.5) (Blank).12    (2) An applicant for a roofing contractor license must 13submit satisfactory evidence that:14        (a) the applicant he or she has obtained public 15    liability and property damage insurance in such amounts 16    and under such circumstances as may be determined by the 17    Department;18        (b) the applicant he or she has obtained Workers' 19    Compensation insurance for roofing covering the 20    applicant's his or her employees or is approved as a 21    self-insurer of Workers' Compensation in accordance with 22    Illinois law;23        (c) the applicant he or she has an unemployment 24    insurance employer account number issued by the Department 25    of Employment Security, and the applicant he or she is not 26    delinquent in the payment of any amount due under the   SB2503 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    Unemployment Insurance Act;2        (d) the applicant he or she has submitted a continuous 3    bond to the Department in the amount of $10,000 for a 4    limited license and in the amount of $25,000 for an 5    unlimited license; and6        (e) the a qualifying party has satisfactorily 7    completed the examination required under Section 3.5.8    (3) It is the ongoing responsibility of the licensee to 9provide to the Department notice in writing of any and all 10changes in the information required to be provided on the 11application, including, but not limited to, a change in the 12licensee's assumed name, if applicable.13    (3.5) The qualifying party shall be an employee who 14receives compensation from and is under the supervision and 15control of the licensed roofing contractor business employer 16that regularly deducts the payroll tax under the Federal 17Insurance Contributions Act, deducts withholding tax, and 18provides workers' compensation as prescribed by law. The 19qualifying party shall not receive a Form 1099 from the 20licensed roofing contractor business. 21    (4) (Blank).22    (5) Nothing in this Section shall apply to a seller of 23roofing services materials or roofing materials services when 24the construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, or 25repair of roofing or waterproofing is to be performed by a 26subcontractor or a person other than the seller or the   SB2503 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1seller's employees.2    (6) Applicants have 3 years from the date of application 3to complete the application process. If the application has 4not been completed within 3 years, the application shall be 5denied, the fee shall be forfeited and the applicant must 6reapply and meet the requirements in effect at the time of 7reapplication.8(Source: P.A. 98-838, eff. 1-1-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 9    (225 ILCS 335/3.5)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 3.5. Examinations. 12    (a) The Department shall authorize examinations for 13applicants for initial licensure at the time and place it may 14designate. The examinations shall be of a character to fairly 15test the competence and qualifications of applicants to act as 16roofing contractors. Each applicant for limited licenses shall 17designate a qualifying party who shall take an examination, 18the technical portion of which shall cover current residential 19roofing practices. Each applicant for an unlimited license 20shall designate a qualifying party who shall take an 21examination, the technical portion of which shall cover 22current residential, commercial, and industrial roofing 23practices. Both examinations shall cover Illinois 24jurisprudence as it relates to roofing practice. 25    (b) An applicant for a limited license or an unlimited   SB2503 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1license or a qualifying party designated by an applicant for a 2limited license or unlimited license shall pay, either to the 3Department or the designated testing service, a fee 4established by the Department to cover the cost of providing 5the examination. Failure to appear for the examination on the 6scheduled date at the time and place specified, after the 7applicant's application for examination has been received and 8acknowledged by the Department or the designated testing 9service, shall result in forfeiture of the examination fee.10    (c) The qualifying party for an applicant for a new 11license must have passed an examination authorized by the 12Department before the Department may issue a license.13    (d) The application for a license as a corporation, 14business trust, or other legal entity submitted by a sole 15proprietor who is currently licensed under this Act and exempt 16from the examination requirement of this Section shall not be 17considered an application for initial licensure for the 18purposes of this subsection (d) if the sole proprietor is 19named in the application as the qualifying party and is the 20sole owner of the legal entity. Upon issuance of a license to 21the new legal entity, the sole proprietorship license is 22terminated.23    The application for initial licensure as a partnership, 24corporation, professional limited liability company, limited 25liability company, business trust, or other legal entity 26submitted by a currently licensed partnership, corporation,   SB2503 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1professional limited liability company, limited liability 2company, business trust, or other legal entity shall not be 3considered an application for initial licensure for the 4purposes of this subsection (d) if the entity's current 5qualifying party is exempt from the examination requirement of 6this Section, that qualifying party is named as the new legal 7entity's qualifying party, and the majority of ownership in 8the new legal entity remains the same as the currently 9licensed entity. Upon issuance of a license to the new legal 10entity under this subsection (d), the former license issued to 11the applicant is terminated. 12    (e) A roofing contractor applicant and a qualifying party 13An applicant have has 3 years after the date of application to 14complete the application process. If the process has not been 15completed within 3 years, the application shall be denied, the 16fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and 17meet the requirements in effect at the time of reapplication.18(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 19    (225 ILCS 335/4.5)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 4.5. Duties and responsibilities of qualifying party; 22acceptance replacement; grounds for discipline. 23    (a) While named as and engaged as or named as a qualifying 24party for a roofing contractor licensee, no person may be the 25named qualifying party for any other licensee. However, the   SB2503 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1person may act in the capacity of the qualifying party for one 2additional roofing contractor licensee of the same type of 3licensure only if one of the following conditions exists: 4        (1) the person has there is a common ownership or 5    management interest of at least 25% of each licensed 6    entity for which the person acts as a qualifying party; or 7        (2) the same person acts as a qualifying party for one 8    licensed entity and its licensed subsidiary.9    "Subsidiary" as used in this Section means a corporation, 10professional limited liability company, or limited liability 11company of which at least 25% is owned or managed by another 12roofing contractor licensee.13    (b) At all times a licensed roofing contractor shall have 14one corresponding qualifying party actively engaged in the 15day-to-day activities of the roofing contractor's business, 16except for a change in qualifying party as set forth in Section 174.6 and the rules adopted under this Act Upon the loss of a 18qualifying party who is not replaced, the qualifying party or 19the licensee, or both, shall notify the Department of the name 20and address of the newly designated qualifying party. The 21newly designated qualifying party must take and pass the 22examination prescribed in Section 3.5 of this Act. These 23requirements shall be met in a timely manner as established by 24rule of the Department.25    (c) A qualifying party that is accepted by the Department 26shall be issued an appropriate credential and shall have and   SB2503 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1exercise the authority to act for the licensed entity in all 2matters connected with its roofing contracting business and to 3supervise roofing installation operations. This authority 4shall not be deemed to be a license for purposes of this Act. 5Upon acceptance, the qualifying party shall act on behalf of 6the licensed roofing contractor entity only, except as 7provided for in subsection (a). 8    (d) Designation of a qualifying party by an applicant 9under this Section and Section 3 is subject to acceptance by 10the Department. The Department may refuse to accept a 11qualifying party (i) for failure to qualify as required under 12this Act and the rules adopted under this Act or (ii) after 13making a determination that the designated qualifying party 14has a history of acting illegally, fraudulently, 15incompetently, or with gross negligence in the roofing or 16construction business.17    The qualifying party who has been accepted by the 18Department shall maintain the qualifying party's duties and 19responsibilities to the licensed roofing contractor as 20follows:21        (1) The qualifying party may have a common ownership 22    or management interest in the licensed roofing contractor 23    entity, and, on behalf of the licensed entity, may serve 24    as an estimator, salesperson, project manager, 25    superintendent, or in a similar capacity as defined by 26    rule;  SB2503 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (2) The qualifying party may delegate the qualifying 2    party's supervising authority over the persons performing 3    the onsite roofing work only to another employee of the 4    licensed roofing contractor;5        (3) While engaged as a qualifying party for a licensed 6    roofing contractor, the qualifying party shall not accept 7    other employment that would conflict with the individual's 8    duties as a qualifying party or conflict with the 9    individual's ability to supervise adequately the work 10    performed by the licensed roofing contractor;11        (4) The qualifying party shall not act on behalf of an 12    unlicensed entity or a subcontractor that is not the 13    qualifying party's licensee; and14        (5) The qualifying party shall not use the qualifying 15    party's credential for the benefit of an unlicensed person 16    or a roofing contractor that has not designated the 17    individual to qualify the contractor for licensure in 18    accordance with this Act, unless the licensed roofing 19    contractor affiliated with the qualifying party is a 20    subcontractor or seller of roofing services pursuant to a 21    bona fide contract for roofing contracting services. 22    (e) The Department may, at any time after giving 23appropriate notice and the opportunity for a hearing, suspend 24or revoke its acceptance of a qualifying party designated by a 25roofing contractor licensee and impose other discipline, 26including, but not limited to, fines not to exceed $15,000 per   SB2503 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1violation for any act or failure to act that gives rise to any 2ground for disciplinary action against that roofing contractor 3licensee under this Act and the rules adopted under this Act. 4If the Department suspends or revokes its acceptance of a 5qualifying party, the license of the roofing contractor 6licensee shall be deemed to be suspended until a new 7qualifying party has been designated by the roofing contractor 8licensee and accepted by the Department.9    If acceptance of a qualifying party is suspended or 10revoked for action or inaction that constitutes a violation of 11this Act or the rules adopted under this Act, the Department 12may in addition take such other disciplinary or 13non-disciplinary action as it may deem proper against the 14licensee or qualifying party, including imposing a fine on the 15qualifying party, not to exceed $15,000 $10,000 for each 16violation.17    All administrative decisions of the Department under this 18subsection (e) are subject to judicial review pursuant to 19Section 9.7 of this Act. An order taking action against a 20qualifying party shall be deemed a final administrative 21decision of the Department for purposes of Section 9.7 of this 22Act. 23(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 24    (225 ILCS 335/4.6 new)25    Sec. 4.6. Qualifying party termination; succession;   SB2503 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1inoperative status.2    (a) The licensed roofing contractor shall provide 3information as requested by the Department, which shall 4include, but not be limited to, the name and contact 5information of the qualifying party.6    (b) A qualifying party shall at all times maintain a 7valid, active credential only on behalf of the qualifying 8party's corresponding licensed roofing contractor.9    (c) In the event a qualifying party is terminated or has an 10active status as the qualifying party of the licensed roofing 11contractor terminated, both the licensee and the qualifying 12party shall notify the Department of this disassociation in 13writing, by regular mail or email, within 30 business days 14after the date of disassociation. If such notice is not given 15in a timely manner, the license will be placed on inoperative 16status.17    (d) Upon the termination, loss, or disassociation of the 18qualifying party, the licensed roofing contractor, if it has 19so informed the Department of the disassociation, shall notify 20the Department of the name and address of the newly designated 21qualifying party within 60 days after the date the licensee 22notifies the Department of the date of disassociation. If such 23notice is not given in a timely manner, the license will be 24placed on inoperative status.25    (e) The Department shall determine the newly designated 26qualifying party's fitness to have the roofing contracting   SB2503 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1license requalified, including, but not limited to, the 2application qualifications to sit for the examination.3    (f) Within 7 months after approval by the Department, the 4newly designated qualifying party must take and pass the 5examination prescribed in Section 3.5 of this Act to requalify 6the roofing contracting license.7    (g) If a licensed roofing contractor fails to requalify 8through the newly designated qualifying party within the time 9prescribed by the Department by rule, the license is 10automatically placed in inoperative status at the end of the 11time period until the licensee requalifies through another 12newly designated qualifying party. The requirements in this 13Section shall be met in a timely manner as established by rule 14of the Department.15    (h) The license of any roofing contractor whose 16association with a qualifying party has terminated shall 17automatically become inoperative immediately upon such 18termination. An inoperative licensee under this Act shall not 19perform any roofing contracting services while the license is 20in inoperative status, unless the licensee meets all of the 21criteria outlined in this Section. 22    (225 ILCS 335/5.1)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 5.1. Commercial vehicles. Any entity offering 25services regulated by the Roofing Industry Licensing Act shall   SB2503 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1affix the roofing contractor license number and the licensee's 2name, as it appears on the license, on all commercial vehicles 3used in offering such services. An entity in violation of this 4Section shall be subject to a civil penalty of no less than 5$250 and no more than $1,000 civil penalty. This Section may be 6enforced by the Department, the Attorney General, or local 7code enforcement officials employed by units of local 8government as it relates to roofing work being performed 9within the boundaries of their jurisdiction. For purposes of 10this Section, "code enforcement official" means an officer or 11other designated authority charged with the administration, 12interpretation, and enforcement of codes on behalf of a 13municipality or county. If the alleged violation has been 14corrected prior to or on the date of the hearing scheduled to 15adjudicate the alleged violation, the violation shall be 16dismissed.17(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 18    (225 ILCS 335/5.5)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 5.5. Contracts. 21    (a) A licensed roofing contractor, when signing a contract 22for professional roofing services, must include in the 23contract provide a land-based phone number, and a street 24address other than a post office box, and an email address at 25which the roofing contractor may be contacted.  SB2503 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (b) Prior to engaging in any roofing work, a roofing 2contractor shall provide a written contract to the property 3owner, signed by both the roofing contractor or the roofing 4contractor's designee and the property owner, stating at least 5the following terms:6        (1) the scope of roofing services and materials to be 7    provided;8        (2) the approximate dates of service;9        (3) for roof repair, the approximate costs of the 10    services based on damages known at the time the contract 11    is entered;12        (4) the licensed roofing contractor's contact 13    information, including a street address other than a post 14    office box, email address, phone number, and any other 15    contact information available for the roofing contractor;16        (5) identification of the roofing contractor's surety 17    and liability coverage insurer and the insurer's contact 18    information, if applicable;19        (6) the roofing contractor's policy regarding 20    cancellation of the contract and refund of any deposit, 21    including a rescission clause allowing the property owner 22    to rescind the contract and obtain a full refund of any 23    deposit within 72 hours after entering the contract and a 24    written statement that the property owner may rescind a 25    roofing contract; and26        (7) a written statement that if the property owner   SB2503 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    plans to use the proceeds of a property and casualty 2    insurance policy issued to pay for the roofing work, the 3    roofing contractor cannot pay, waive, rebate, or promise 4    to pay, waive, or rebate all or part of any insurance 5    deductible applicable to the insurance claim for payment 6    for roofing work on the covered property.7    (c) In addition to the contract terms required in 8subsection (b) of this Section, a licensed roofing contractor 9shall include, on the face of the contract, in bold-faced 10type, a statement indicating that the roofing contractor shall 11hold in trust any payment from the property owner until the 12roofing contractor has delivered roofing materials at the 13property site or has performed a majority of the roofing work 14on the property.15    (d) The roofing contractor for a roofing project shall 16keep a fully executed copy of the contract for professional 17roofing services available for inspection by the Department.18    (e) In awarding a contract for professional roofing 19services, if the property owner is the State or any 20municipality, county, incorporated area, or school district, 21the property owner or responsible public entity shall conduct 22a bona fide procurement process in accordance with applicable 23law in which the awarded vendor or a subcontractor holds the 24applicable verified active licenses and a qualifying party 25credential issued by the Department. 26(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.)   SB2503 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (225 ILCS 335/6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7506)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 6. Expiration and renewal; inactive status; 4restoration. 5    (a) The expiration date and renewal period for each 6certificate of registration issued under this Act shall be set 7by the Department by rule.8    (b) A licensee who has permitted the licensee's his or her 9license to expire or whose license is on inactive status may 10have the his or her license restored by making application to 11the Department in the form and manner prescribed by the 12Department.13    (c) A licensee who notifies the Department in writing on 14forms prescribed by the Department may elect to place the his 15or her license on inactive status and shall, subject to rules 16of the Department, be excused from payment of renewal fees 17until the licensee he or she notifies the Department in 18writing of the licensee's his or her desire to resume active 19status.20    (d) A licensee whose license expired while the licensee's 21qualifying party he or she was (1) on active duty with the 22Armed Forces of the United States or the State Militia called 23into service or training or (2) in training or education under 24the supervision of the United States preliminary to induction 25into the military service, may have the his or her license   SB2503 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1renewed or restored without paying any lapsed renewal fees if, 2within 2 years after termination of such service, training, or 3education, except under conditions other than honorable, the 4qualifying party he or she furnishes the Department with 5satisfactory evidence to the effect that the qualifying party 6he or she has been so engaged and that the qualifying party's 7his or her service, training, or education has been so 8terminated.9    (e) A roofing contractor whose license is expired or on 10inactive status shall not practice under this Act in the State 11of Illinois. 12(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 13    (225 ILCS 335/7.1)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)15    Sec. 7.1. Applicant convictions. 16    (a) When reviewing a conviction by plea of guilty or nolo 17contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of 18judgment or by sentencing of an initial applicant, the 19Department may only deny a license or refuse to accept a 20designated qualifying party based upon consideration of 21mitigating factors provided in subsection (c) of this Section 22for a felony directly related to the practice of roofing 23contracting.24    (b) The following crimes or similar offenses in any other 25jurisdiction are hereby deemed directly related to the   SB2503 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1practice of roofing contracting:2        (1) first degree murder;3        (2) second degree murder;4        (3) drug induced homicide;5        (4) unlawful restraint;6        (5) aggravated unlawful restraint;7        (6) forcible detention;8        (7) involuntary servitude;9        (8) involuntary sexual servitude of a minor;10        (9) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child;11        (10) aggravated criminal sexual assault;12        (11) criminal sexual assault;13        (12) criminal sexual abuse;14        (13) aggravated kidnaping;15        (14) aggravated robbery;16        (15) armed robbery;17        (16) kidnapping;18        (17) aggravated battery;19        (18) aggravated vehicular hijacking;20        (19) home invasion;21        (20) terrorism;22        (21) causing a catastrophe;23        (22) possession of a deadly substance;24        (23) making a terrorist threat;25        (24) material support for terrorism;26        (25) hindering prosecution of terrorism;  SB2503 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (26) armed violence;2        (27) any felony based on consumer fraud or deceptive 3    business practices under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 4    Business Practices Act;5        (28) any felony requiring registration as a sex 6    offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act;7        (29) attempt of any the offenses set forth in 8    paragraphs (1) through (28) of this subsection (b); and9        (30) convictions set forth in subsection (e) of 10    Section 5 or Section 9.8 of this Act.11    (c) The Department shall consider any mitigating factors 12contained in the record, when determining the appropriate 13disciplinary sanction, if any, to be imposed. In addition to 14those set forth in Section 2105-130 of the Department of 15Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 16of Illinois, mitigating factors shall include the following:17        (1) the bearing, if any, the criminal offense or 18    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 19    will have on the person's his or her fitness or ability to 20    perform one or more such duties and responsibilities;21        (2) the time that has elapsed since the criminal 22    conviction; and23        (3) the age of the person at the time of the criminal 24    conviction.25    (d) The Department shall issue an annual report by January 2631, 2027 2018 and by January 31 each year thereafter,   SB2503 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1indicating the following:2        (1) the number of initial applicants for a license 3    under this Act within the preceding calendar year;4        (2) the number of initial applicants for a license 5    under this Act within the previous calendar year who had a 6    conviction;7        (3) the number of applicants with a conviction who 8    were granted a license under this Act within the previous 9    year;10        (4) the number of applicants denied a license under 11    this Act within the preceding calendar year; and12        (5) the number of applicants denied a license under 13    this Act solely on the basis of a conviction within the 14    preceding calendar year.15    (e) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department 16taking disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against a 17license as set forth in Section 9.1 of this Act. 18(Source: P.A. 99-876, eff. 1-1-17.) 19    (225 ILCS 335/9)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7509)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 9. Licensure requirement. 22    (1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business 23of providing professional roofing services or act in the 24capacity of or hold himself, herself, or itself out in any 25manner as a roofing contractor or a qualifying party without   SB2503 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1having been duly licensed or accepted by the Department under 2the provisions of this Act.3    (2) No work involving the construction, reconstruction, 4alteration, maintenance, or repair of any kind of roofing or 5waterproofing may be done except by a roofing contractor or a 6qualifying party licensed or credentialed under this Act.7    (3) Sellers of roofing services may subcontract the 8provision of those roofing services only to roofing 9contractors licensed under this Act. Subcontractors that are 10licensed roofing contractors shall have at all times updated 11assumed business names disclosed to the Department, if 12applicable. 13    (4) All persons performing roofing services under this Act 14shall be licensed as roofing contractors, except for 15qualifying parties and those persons who are deemed to be 16employees under Section 10 of the Employee Classification Act 17of a licensed roofing contractor. 18(Source: P.A. 98-838, eff. 1-1-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 19    (225 ILCS 335/9.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7509.1)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 9.1. Grounds for disciplinary action. 22    (1) The Department may refuse to issue, to accept, or to 23renew, or may revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand 24or take other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the 25Department may deem proper, including fines not to exceed   SB2503 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1$15,000 $10,000 for each violation, with regard to any license 2or credential for any one or combination of the following:3        (a) violation of this Act or its rules;4        (b) for licensees, conviction or plea of guilty or 5    nolo contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry 6    of judgment or sentencing of any crime, including, but not 7    limited to, convictions, preceding sentences of 8    supervision, conditional discharge, or first offender 9    probation, under the laws of any jurisdiction of the 10    United States that is (i) a felony or (ii) a misdemeanor, 11    an essential element of which is dishonesty or that is 12    directly related to the practice of the profession and, 13    for initial applicants, convictions set forth in Section 14    7.1 of this Act; 15        (c) fraud or any misrepresentation in applying for or 16    procuring a license under this Act, or in connection with 17    applying for renewal of a license under this Act;18        (d) professional incompetence or gross negligence in 19    the practice of roofing contracting, prima facie evidence 20    of which may be a conviction or judgment in any court of 21    competent jurisdiction against an applicant or licensee 22    and that relates relating to the practice of roofing 23    contracting or the construction of a roof or repair 24    thereof that results in leakage within 90 days after the 25    completion of such work;26        (e) (blank);  SB2503 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (f) aiding or assisting another person in violating 2    any provision of this Act or its rules;3        (g) failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 4    response to a written request made by the Department;5        (h) engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 6    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 7    defraud, or harm the public;8        (i) habitual or excessive use or abuse of controlled 9    substances, as defined by the Illinois Controlled 10    Substances Act, alcohol, or any other substance that 11    results in the inability to practice with reasonable 12    judgment, skill, or safety;13        (j) discipline by another state, unit of government, 14    or government agency, the District of Columbia, a 15    territory, or a foreign country nation, if at least one of 16    the grounds for the discipline is the same or 17    substantially equivalent to those set forth in this 18    Section. This includes any adverse action taken by a State 19    or federal agency that prohibits a roofing contractor or 20    qualifying party from providing services to the agency's 21    participants;22        (k) directly or indirectly giving to or receiving from 23    any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association 24    any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of compensation 25    for any professional services not actually or personally 26    rendered;  SB2503 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (l) a finding by the Department that any the licensee 2    or individual with a qualifying party credential under 3    this Act, after having the individual's his or her license 4    or credential disciplined, has violated the terms of the 5    discipline;6        (m) a finding by any court of competent jurisdiction, 7    either within or without this State, of any violation of 8    any law governing the practice of roofing contracting, if 9    the Department determines, after investigation, that such 10    person has not been sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant 11    the public trust;12        (n) willfully making or filing false records or 13    reports in the practice of roofing contracting, including, 14    but not limited to, false records filed with the State 15    agencies or departments;16        (o) practicing, attempting to practice, or advertising 17    under a name other than the full name as shown on the 18    license or credential or any other legally authorized 19    name;20        (p) gross and willful overcharging for professional 21    services including filing false statements for collection 22    of fees or monies for which services are not rendered;23        (q) (blank);24        (r) (blank);25        (s) failure to continue to meet the requirements of 26    this Act shall be deemed a violation;  SB2503 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (t) physical or mental disability, including 2    deterioration through the aging process or loss of 3    abilities and skills that result in an inability to 4    practice the profession with reasonable judgment, skill, 5    or safety;6        (u) material misstatement in furnishing information to 7    the Department or to any other State agency;8        (v) (blank);9        (w) advertising in any manner that is false, 10    misleading, or deceptive;11        (x) taking undue advantage of a customer, which 12    results in the perpetration of a fraud;13        (y) performing any act or practice that is a violation 14    of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices 15    Act;16        (z) engaging in the practice of roofing contracting, 17    as defined in this Act, with a suspended, revoked, 18    canceled, nonrenewed, or otherwise inoperative or 19    cancelled license or credential;20        (aa) treating any person differently to the person's 21    detriment because of race, color, creed, gender, age, 22    religion, or national origin;23        (bb) knowingly making any false statement, oral, 24    written, or otherwise, of a character likely to influence, 25    persuade, or induce others in the course of obtaining or 26    performing roofing contracting services;  SB2503 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (cc) violation of any final administrative action of 2    the Secretary; 3        (dd) allowing the use of the his or her roofing 4    license or qualifying party credential by an unlicensed 5    roofing contractor for the purposes of providing roofing 6    or waterproofing services; or7        (ee) (blank);8        (ff) cheating or attempting to subvert a licensing 9    examination administered under this Act; or10        (gg) use of a license or credential to permit or 11    enable an unlicensed person to provide roofing contractor 12    services.13    (2) The determination by a circuit court that a license or 14credential holder is subject to involuntary admission or 15judicial admission, as provided in the Mental Health and 16Developmental Disabilities Code, operates as an automatic 17suspension. Such suspension will end only upon a finding by a 18court that the patient is no longer subject to involuntary 19admission or judicial admission, an order by the court so 20finding and discharging the patient, and the recommendation of 21the Board to the Director of the Division of Professional 22Regulation that the license or credential holder be allowed to 23resume the license or credential holder's his or her practice.24    (3) The Department may refuse to issue or take 25disciplinary action concerning the license or credential of 26any person who fails to file a return, to pay the tax, penalty,   SB2503 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any final 2assessment of tax, penalty, or interest as required by any tax 3Act administered by the Department of Revenue, until such time 4as the requirements of any such tax Act are satisfied as 5determined by the Department of Revenue.6    (4) In enforcing this Section, the Department, upon a 7showing of a possible violation, may compel any individual who 8is licensed or credentialed under this Act or any individual 9who has applied for licensure or a credential to submit to a 10mental or physical examination or evaluation, or both, which 11may include a substance abuse or sexual offender evaluation, 12at the expense of the Department. The Department shall 13specifically designate the examining physician licensed to 14practice medicine in all of its branches or, if applicable, 15the multidisciplinary team involved in providing the mental or 16physical examination and evaluation. The multidisciplinary 17team shall be led by a physician licensed to practice medicine 18in all of its branches and may consist of one or more or a 19combination of physicians licensed to practice medicine in all 20of its branches, licensed chiropractic physicians, licensed 21clinical psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, 22licensed clinical professional counselors, and other 23professional and administrative staff. Any examining physician 24or member of the multidisciplinary team may require any person 25ordered to submit to an examination and evaluation pursuant to 26this Section to submit to any additional supplemental testing   SB2503 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1deemed necessary to complete any examination or evaluation 2process, including, but not limited to, blood testing, 3urinalysis, psychological testing, or neuropsychological 4testing.5    (5) The Department may order the examining physician or 6any member of the multidisciplinary team to provide to the 7Department any and all records, including business records, 8that relate to the examination and evaluation, including any 9supplemental testing performed. The Department may order the 10examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 11team to present testimony concerning this examination and 12evaluation of the licensee or applicant, including testimony 13concerning any supplemental testing or documents relating to 14the examination and evaluation. No information, report, 15record, or other documents in any way related to the 16examination and evaluation shall be excluded by reason of any 17common law or statutory privilege relating to communication 18between the licensee or applicant and the examining physician 19or any member of the multidisciplinary team. No authorization 20is necessary from the licensee, qualifying party, or applicant 21ordered to undergo an evaluation and examination for the 22examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 23team to provide information, reports, records, or other 24documents or to provide any testimony regarding the 25examination and evaluation. The individual to be examined may 26have, at the individual's his or her own expense, another   SB2503 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1physician of the individual's his or her choice present during 2all aspects of the examination.3    (6) Failure of any individual to submit to mental or 4physical examination or evaluation, or both, when directed, 5shall result in an automatic suspension without hearing until 6such time as the individual submits to the examination. If the 7Department finds a licensee or qualifying party unable to 8practice because of the reasons set forth in this Section, the 9Department shall require the licensee or qualifying party to 10submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians 11approved or designated by the Department as a condition for 12continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure.13    (7) When the Secretary immediately suspends a license or 14credential under this Section, a hearing upon such person's 15license or credential must be convened by the Department 16within 15 days after the suspension and completed without 17appreciable delay. The Department shall have the authority to 18review the licensee's or qualifying party's record of 19treatment and counseling regarding the impairment to the 20extent permitted by applicable federal statutes and 21regulations safeguarding the confidentiality of medical 22records.23    (8) Licensees and qualifying parties affected under this 24Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the 25Department that they can resume practice in compliance with 26acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions of   SB2503 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1their license.2    (9) (Blank).3    (10) In cases where the Department of Healthcare and 4Family Services has previously determined a licensee, 5qualifying party, or a potential licensee, or potential 6qualifying party is more than 30 days delinquent in the 7payment of child support and has subsequently certified the 8delinquency to the Department, the Department may refuse to 9issue or renew or may revoke or suspend that person's license 10or credential or may take other disciplinary action against 11that person based solely upon the certification of delinquency 12made by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 13accordance with paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 142105-15 of the Department of Professional Regulation Law of 15the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16    The changes to this Act made by this amendatory Act of 1997 17apply only to disciplinary actions relating to events 18occurring after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 191997.20(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-876, eff. 1-1-17; 21100-872, eff. 8-14-18.) 22    (225 ILCS 335/9.4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7509.4)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 9.4. Subpoenas; oaths. The Department has power to 25subpoena and bring before it any person in this State and to   SB2503 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1take the oral or written testimony, or to compel the 2production of any books, papers, records, documents, exhibits, 3or other materials that the Secretary or the Secretary's his 4or her designee deems relevant or material to an investigation 5or hearing conducted by the Department, with the same fees and 6mileage and in the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial 7proceedings in civil cases in courts of this State.8    The Secretary, the designated hearing officer, any member 9of the Board, or a certified shorthand court reporter may 10administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 11Department conducts. Notwithstanding any other statute or 12Department rule to the contrary, all requests for testimony or 13production of documents or records shall be in accordance with 14this Act.15(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 16    (225 ILCS 335/9.7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7509.7)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 9.7. Final administrative decisions. All final 19administrative decisions of the Department are subject to 20judicial review pursuant to the Administrative Review Law and 21all rules adopted pursuant thereto. The term "administrative 22decision" is defined as in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil 23Procedure. Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced 24in the circuit court of the county in which the party applying 25for review resides, except that, if the party is not a resident   SB2503 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1of this State, the venue shall be Sangamon County. 2(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 3    (225 ILCS 335/9.8)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7509.8)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 9.8. Criminal penalties. Any person who is found to 6have violated any provision of this Act is guilty of a Class A 7misdemeanor for the first offense and such violation may 8result in a sentence in accordance with subsection (a) of 9Section 5-4.5-55 of the Unified Code of Corrections and a fine 10not to exceed $2,500. On conviction of a second or subsequent 11offense, the violator is guilty of a Class 4 felony, which may 12result in a sentence in accordance with subsection (a) of 13Section 5-4.5-45 of the Unified Code of Corrections and a fine 14of $25,000. Each day of violation constitutes a separate 15offense. Fines for any and all criminal penalties imposed 16shall be payable to the Department. 17(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 18    (225 ILCS 335/10a)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 10a. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 21    (a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any 22person who practices, offers to practice, attempts to 23practice, or holds himself or herself out to practice roofing 24without being licensed under this Act shall, in addition to   SB2503 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil penalty to the 2Department in an amount not to exceed $15,000 $10,000 for each 3offense as determined by the Department. The civil penalty 4shall be assessed by the Department after a hearing is held in 5accordance with the provisions set forth in this Act regarding 6the provision of a hearing for the discipline of a licensee.7    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 8investigate any and all unlicensed activity.9    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 10the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 11The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 12execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 13any court of record.14(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 335/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7511)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 11. Application of Act. 18    (1) Nothing in this Act limits the power of a 19municipality, city, county, or incorporated area, or school 20district to regulate the quality and character of work 21performed by roofing contractors through a system of permits, 22fees, and inspections which are designed to secure compliance 23with and aid in the implementation of State and local building 24laws or to enforce other local laws for the protection of the 25public health and safety.  SB2503 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (2) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require a 2seller of roofing services materials or a seller of roofing 3materials services to be licensed as a roofing contractor when 4the construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance or 5repair of roofing or waterproofing is to be performed by a 6person other than the seller or the seller's employees.7    (3) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require a 8person who performs roofing or waterproofing work to the 9person's his or her own property, or for no consideration, to 10be licensed as a roofing contractor.11    (3.5) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require an 12employee who performs roofing or waterproofing work to an his 13or her employer's residential property, where there exists an 14employee-employer relationship or for no consideration, to be 15licensed as a roofing contractor. 16    (4) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require a 17person who performs roof repair or waterproofing work to an 18his or her employer's commercial or industrial property to be 19licensed as a roofing contractor, where there exists an 20employer-employee relationship. Nothing in this Act shall be 21construed to apply to the installation of plastics, glass or 22fiberglass to greenhouses and related horticultural 23structures, or to the repair or construction of farm 24buildings.25    (5) Nothing in this Act limits the power of a 26municipality, city, county, or incorporated area, or school   SB2503 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1district to collect occupational license and inspection fees 2for engaging in roofing contracting.3    (6) Nothing in this Act limits the power of the 4municipalities, cities, counties, or incorporated areas, or 5school districts to adopt any system of permits requiring 6submission to and approval by the municipality, city, county, 7or incorporated area of plans and specifications for work to 8be performed by roofing contractors before commencement of the 9work.10    (7) Any official authorized to issue building or other 11related permits shall ascertain that the applicant contractor 12is duly licensed before issuing the permit. The evidence shall 13consist only of the exhibition to him or her of current 14evidence of licensure.15    (8) This Act applies to any roofing contractor performing 16work for the State or any municipality, city, county, or 17incorporated area, or school district. Officers of the State 18or any municipality, city, county, or incorporated area, or 19school district are required to determine compliance with this 20Act before awarding any contracts for construction, 21improvement, remodeling, or repair.22    (9) If an incomplete contract exists at the time of death 23of a qualifying party or the dissolution of a roofing 24contractor licensee, the contract may be completed by any 25person even though not licensed or credentialed. Such person 26shall notify the Department within 30 days after the death of   SB2503 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1the qualifying party or the dissolution of the roofing 2contractor of the person's his or her name and address. For the 3purposes of this subsection (9), an incomplete contract is one 4which has been awarded to, or entered into by, the licensee 5before the dissolution or the his or her death of the 6qualifying party or on which the licensee he or she was the low 7bidder and the contract is subsequently awarded to the roofing 8contractor him or her regardless of whether any actual work 9has commenced under the contract before the dissolution or the 10his or her death of the qualifying party.11    (10) The State or any municipality, city, county, or 12incorporated area, or school district may require that bids 13submitted for roofing construction, improvement, remodeling, 14or repair of public buildings be accompanied by evidence that 15that bidder holds an appropriate license issued pursuant to 16this Act.17    (11) (Blank).18    (12) Nothing in this Act shall prevent a municipality, 19city, county, or incorporated area, or school district from 20making laws or ordinances that are more stringent than those 21contained in this Act. 22    (13) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent or 23limit the practice of professional engineering as defined in 24the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989 or the 25practice of structural engineering as defined in the 26Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.   SB2503 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 100-545, eff. 11-8-17.) 2    (225 ILCS 335/11.5)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 11.5. Roofing Advisory Board. There is created within 5the Department a Roofing Advisory Board to be composed of 6persons: The Roofing Advisory Board is created and shall 7consist of 8 persons8    (a) Nine members, one of whom is a knowledgeable public 9member and 5 7 of whom are each (i) designated as the 10qualifying party of a licensed roofing contractor or (ii) 11legally qualified to act for the business entity organization 12on behalf of the licensed roofing contractor licensee in all 13matters connected with its roofing contracting business, 14exercise have the authority to supervise roofing installation 15operations, and actively engaged in day-to-day activities of 16the business entity organization for a licensed roofing 17contractor. One shall represent . One of the 7 nonpublic 18members on the Board shall represent a statewide association 19representing home builders, another shall represent and 20another of the 7 nonpublic members shall represent an 21association predominantly predominately representing 22retailers, and another shall represent the employees of 23licensed roofing contractors.24     The public member shall not represent any association or 25be licensed or credentialed under this Act.  SB2503 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (b) Each member shall be appointed by the Secretary. The 2membership of the Board should represent racial, ethnic, and 3cultural diversity and reasonably reflect representation from 4the various geographic areas of the State. Five members of the 5Board shall constitute a quorum. A quorum is required for all 6Board decisions. 7    (c) Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 8action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other acts 9performed in good faith as members of the Board, unless the 10conduct that gave rise to the suit was willful and wanton 11misconduct.12    (d) Terms for each member of the Board shall be for 4 13years. A member shall serve until the member's successor is 14qualified and appointed. Partial terms over 2 years in length 15shall be considered as full terms. A member may be reappointed 16for a successive term, but no member shall serve more than 2 17full terms. For any such reappointment, the second term shall 18begin the day after the end of the first full term. The persons 19appointed shall hold office for 4 years and until a successor 20is appointed and qualified. No member shall serve more than 2 21complete 4 year terms.22    (e) The Secretary may terminate or refuse the appointment 23of shall have the authority to remove or suspend any member of 24the Board for cause at any time before the expiration of his or 25her term. The Secretary shall be the sole arbiter of cause. 26    (f) The Secretary shall fill a vacancy for the unexpired   SB2503 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1portion of the term with an appointee who meets the same 2qualifications as the person whose position has become vacant. 3The Board shall meet annually to elect one member as chairman 4and one member as vice-chairman. No officer shall be elected 5more than twice in succession to the same office.6    (g) The members of the Board shall be reimbursed receive 7reimbursement for all legitimate actual, necessary, and 8authorized expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the 9Board.10(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 335/11.5a new)12    Sec. 11.5a. Roofing Advisory Board; powers and duties.13    (a) The Board shall meet at least once per year or as 14otherwise called by the Secretary.15    (b) Five members of the Board currently appointed shall 16constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the membership of the Board 17shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the 18rights and perform all the duties of the Board.19    (c) Each member, in exercising the member's duties on 20behalf of the Board, shall not engage in any self-interest, 21including, but not limited to, conduct contrary to an 22appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 23Department.24    (d) The Board shall annually elect a chairperson and a 25vice chairperson who shall be qualifying parties credentialed   SB2503 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1under this Act. No officer shall be elected more than twice in 2succession to the same office unless there are extenuating 3circumstances.4    (e) The Board shall elect a successor chairperson or vice 5chairperson in the event such officer position becomes vacant, 6and such successor shall serve the remainder of the vacating 7officer's term.8    (f) Without limiting the power of the Department to 9conduct investigations, the Board may recommend to the 10Secretary that one or more credentialed qualifying parties be 11selected by the Secretary to conduct or assist in any 12investigation pursuant to this Act. Each such credentialed 13qualifying party may receive remuneration as determined by the 14Secretary.  15    (225 ILCS 335/11.8)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 11.8. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 18suspension of any license, the licensee shall immediately 19surrender the license or licenses or credential or credentials 20to the Department. If the licensee or qualifying party fails 21to do so, the Department shall have the right to seize the 22license or credential.23(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 24    Section 15. The Professional Geologist Licensing Act is   SB2503 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1amended by changing Sections 15, 20, 25, 30, 35, 40, 45, 50, 254, 65, 75, 80, 85, 90, 110, 120, 125, 140, 160, and 180 and by 3adding Sections 18, 41, and 66 as follows: 4    (225 ILCS 745/15)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 15. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 8by the Department in the applicant's application file or the 9licensee's license file, as maintained by the Department's 10licensure maintenance unit.11    "Email address of record" means the designated email 12address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 13application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 14by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 15    "Board" means the Board of Licensing for Professional 16Geologists.17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Geologist" means an individual who, by reason of the 20individual's his or her knowledge of geology, mathematics, and 21the physical and life sciences, acquired by education and 22practical experience as defined by this Act, is capable of 23practicing the science of geology.24    "Geology" means the science that includes the treatment of 25the earth and its origin and history including, but not   SB2503 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1limited to, (i) the investigation of the earth's crust and 2interior and the solids and fluids, including all surface and 3underground waters, gases, and other materials that compose 4the earth as they may relate to geologic processes; (ii) the 5study of the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause 6changes in the earth; and (iii) the utilization of this 7knowledge of the earth and its solids, fluids, and gases, and 8their collective properties and processes, for the benefit of 9humankind.10    "Person" or "individual" means a natural person.11    "Practice of professional geology" means the performance 12of, or the offer to perform, the services of a geologist, 13including consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, 14mapping, inspection of geologic work, and other services that 15require extensive knowledge of geologic laws, formulas, 16principles, practice, and methods of data interpretation.17    Any A person shall be construed to practice or offer to 18practice professional geology, within the meaning and intent 19of this Act, if the that person (i) by verbal claim, sign, 20advertisement, letterhead, card, or any other means, 21represents oneself himself or herself to be a Licensed 22Professional Geologist or through the use of some title 23implies that the person he or she is a Licensed Professional 24Geologist or is licensed under this Act or (ii) holds oneself 25himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform 26services or work defined in this Act as the practice of   SB2503 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1professional geology.2    Examples of the practice of professional geology include, 3but are not limited to, the conduct of, or responsible charge 4for, the following types of activities: (i) mapping, sampling, 5and analysis of earth materials, interpretation of data, and 6the preparation of oral or written testimony regarding the 7probable geological causes of events; (ii) planning, review, 8and supervision of data gathering activities, interpretation 9of geological data gathered by direct and indirect means, 10preparation and interpretation of geological maps, 11cross-sections, interpretive maps and reports for the purpose 12of determining regional or site specific geological 13conditions; (iii) the planning, review, and supervision of 14data gathering activities and interpretation of data on 15regional or site specific geological characteristics affecting 16groundwater; (iv) the interpretation of geological conditions 17on the surface of the Earth and at depth in the Earth for the 18purpose of determining whether those conditions correspond to 19a geologic map of the site or a legally specified geological 20requirement for the site; and (v) the conducting of 21environmental property audits.22    "Licensed Professional Geologist" means an individual who 23is licensed under this Act to engage in the practice of 24professional geology in Illinois.25    "Responsible charge" means the independent control and 26direction, by use of initiative, skill, and independent   SB2503 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1judgment, of geological work or the supervision of that work.2    "Rules" means the rules adopted pursuant to this Act. 3    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 4Professional Regulation. 5    "Seal" means the seal in compliance with Section 60 of 6this Act. 7(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 745/18 new)9    Sec. 18. Address of record; email address of record. All 10applicants and licensees shall:11        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 12    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 13    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 14    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and15        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 16    record or email address of record within 14 days after 17    such change either through the Department's website or by 18    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 19    (225 ILCS 745/20)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 20. Exemptions. Nothing in this Act shall be 22construed to restrict the use of the title "geologist" or 23similar words by any person engaged in a practice of geology 24exempted under this Act, provided the person does not hold the   SB2503 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1person himself or herself out as being a Licensed Professional 2Geologist or does not practice professional geology in a 3manner requiring licensure under this Act. Performance of the 4following activities does not require licensure as a licensed 5professional geologist under this Act:6        (a) The practice of professional geology by an 7    employee or a subordinate of a licensee under this Act, 8    provided the work does not include responsible charge of 9    geological work and is performed under the direct 10    supervision of a Licensed Professional Geologist who is 11    responsible for the work.12        (b) The practice of professional geology by officers 13    and employees of the United States government within the 14    scope of their employment.15        (c) The practice of professional geology as geologic 16    research to advance basic knowledge for the purpose of 17    offering scientific papers, publications, or other 18    presentations (i) before meetings of scientific societies, 19    (ii) internal to a partnership, corporation, 20    proprietorship, or government agency, or (iii) for 21    publication in scientific journals, or in books.22        (d) The teaching of geology in schools, colleges, or 23    universities, as defined by rule.24        (e) The practice of professional geology exclusively 25    in the exploration for or development of energy resources 26    or base, precious and nonprecious minerals, including   SB2503 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    sand, gravel, and aggregate, that does not require, by 2    law, rule, or ordinance, the submission of reports, 3    documents, or oral or written testimony to public 4    agencies. Public agencies may, by law or by rule, allow 5    required oral or written testimony, reports, permit 6    applications, or other documents based on the science of 7    geology to be submitted to them by persons not licensed 8    under this Act. Unless otherwise required by State or 9    federal law, public agencies may not require that the 10    geology-based aspects of testimony, reports, permits, or 11    other documents so exempted be reviewed by, approved, or 12    otherwise certified by any person who is not a Licensed 13    Professional Geologist. Licensure is not required for the 14    submission and review of reports or documents or the 15    provision of oral or written testimony made under the Well 16    Abandonment Act, the Illinois Oil and Gas Act, the Surface 17    Coal Mining Land Conservation and Reclamation Act, or the 18    Surface-Mined Land Conservation and Reclamation Act.19        (f) The practice of professional engineering as 20    defined in the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 21    1989.22        (g) The practice of structural engineering as defined 23    in the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.24        (h) The practice of architecture as defined in the 25    Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989.26        (i) The practice of land surveying as defined in the   SB2503 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989.2        (j) The practice of landscape architecture as defined 3    in the Landscape Architecture Registration Act.4        (k) The practice of professional geology for a period 5    not to exceed 9 months by any person pursuing a course of 6    study leading to a degree in geology from an accredited 7    college or university, as set forth in this Act and as 8    established by rule, provided that (i) such practice 9    constitutes a part of a supervised course of study, (ii) 10    the person is under the supervision of a geologist 11    licensed under this Act or a teacher of geology at an 12    accredited college or university, and (iii) the person is 13    designated by a title that clearly indicates the person's 14    his or her status as a student or trainee. 15(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21.) 16    (225 ILCS 745/25)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 25. Restrictions and limitations. No person shall, 19without a valid license issued by the Department (i) in any 20manner hold oneself himself or herself out to the public as a 21Licensed Professional Geologist; (ii) attach the title 22"Licensed Professional Geologist" to the person's his or her 23name; or (iii) render or offer to render to individuals, 24corporations, or public agencies services constituting the 25practice of professional geology.  SB2503 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 745/30)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 30. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject to 5the provisions of this Act, the Department may:6        (a) Authorize examinations to ascertain the 7    qualifications and fitness of applicants for licensing as 8    a Licensed Professional Geologist or as a Licensed 9    Specialty Geologist, as defined by the Board, and pass 10    upon the qualifications of applicants for licensure by 11    endorsement.12        (b) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 13    or renew licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on 14    probation, reprimand, or take any other disciplinary or 15    non-disciplinary action against licenses issued under this 16    Act.17        (c) Formulate rules required for the administration of 18    this Act.19        (d) Obtain written recommendations from the Board 20    regarding (i) definitions of curriculum content and 21    approval of geological curricula, standards of 22    professional conduct, and formal disciplinary actions and 23    the formulation of rules affecting these matters and (ii) 24    when petitioned by the applicant, opinions regarding the 25    qualifications of applicants for licensing.  SB2503 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (e) Issue licenses to applicants who meet the 2    requirements of this Act. Maintain rosters of the names 3    and addresses of all licensees, and all persons whose 4    licenses have been suspended, revoked, denied renewal, or 5    otherwise disciplined within the previous calendar year. 6    These rosters shall be available upon written request and 7    payment of the required fee.8(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 9    (225 ILCS 745/35)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 35. Board of Licensing for Professional Geologists; 12members; qualifications; duties.13    (a) The Secretary shall appoint a Board of Licensing for 14Professional Geologists which shall serve in an advisory 15capacity to the Secretary. The Board shall be composed of 8 16persons, 7 of whom shall be voting members appointed by the 17Secretary, who shall give due consideration to recommendations 18by members of the profession of geology and of geology 19organizations within the State. In addition, the State 20Geologist or the State Geologist's his or her designated 21representative, shall be an advisory, non-voting member of the 22Board.23    (b) Insofar as possible, the geologists appointed to serve 24on the Board shall be generally representative of the 25occupational and geographical distribution of geologists   SB2503 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1within this State.2    (c) Of the 7 appointed voting members of the Board, 6 shall 3be geologists and one shall be a member of the general public 4with no family or business connection with the practice of 5geology.6    (d) Each of the appointed geologist members of the Board 7shall be a Licensed Professional Geologist licensed under this 8Act with at least 10 years of experience and shall not have 9been disciplined within the last 10 years under this Act.10    (e) Voting members shall be appointed to 4-year terms. 11Partial terms of over 2 years in length shall be considered 12full terms.13    (f) Members shall hold office until the expiration of 14their terms or until their successors have been appointed and 15have qualified.16    (g) No voting member of the Board shall serve more than 2 17consecutive full terms.18    (h) Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be 19filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.20    (i) The Secretary may remove or suspend any appointed 21member of the Board for cause at any time before the expiration 22of the member's his or her term. The Secretary shall be the 23sole arbiter of cause.24    (j) The Board shall annually elect one of its members as 25chairperson and one of its members as vice-chair.26    (k) The members of the Board shall be reimbursed for all   SB2503 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1legitimate and necessary expenses authorized by the Department 2incurred in attending the meetings of the Board.3    (l) The Board may make recommendations to the Secretary to 4establish the examinations and their method of grading.5    (m) The Board may submit written recommendations to the 6Secretary concerning formulation of rules and a Code of 7Professional Conduct and Ethics. The Board may recommend or 8endorse revisions and amendments to the Code and to the rules 9from time to time.10    (n) The Board may make recommendations on matters relating 11to continuing education of Licensed Professional Geologists, 12including the number of hours necessary for license renewal, 13waivers for those unable to meet that requirement, and 14acceptable course content. These recommendations shall not 15impose an undue burden on the Department or an unreasonable 16restriction on those seeking a license renewal.17    (o) Four voting Board members constitute constitutes a 18quorum. A quorum is required for all Board decisions. 19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 20    (225 ILCS 745/40)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 40. Application for original license. 23    (a) Applications for original licenses shall be made to 24the Department on physical or electronic forms prescribed by 25the Department and accompanied by the required fee, which   SB2503 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1shall not be refundable. All applications shall contain the 2information that, in the judgment of the Department, will 3enable the Department to pass on the qualifications of the 4applicant for a license to practice as a Licensed Professional 5Geologist.6    (b) The Department may require an applicant, at the 7applicant's expense, to have an evaluation of the applicant's 8education in a foreign country by a nationally recognized 9evaluation service approved by the Department in accordance 10with rules adopted by the Department.11    (c) Applicants have 3 years from the date of receipt of the 12application to complete the application process. If the 13process has not been completed in 3 years, the application 14shall be denied, the fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant 15must reapply and meet the requirements in effect at the time of 16reapplication. 17(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 18    (225 ILCS 745/41 new)19    Sec. 41. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 20Identification Number on license application. In addition to 21any other information required to be contained in the 22application, every application for an original license under 23this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 24or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 25retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As   SB2503 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 2identification number to each applicant for a license.3    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 4require the applicant's customer identification number. 5    (225 ILCS 745/45)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)7    Sec. 45. Examination; failure or refusal to take the 8examination. 9    (a) The Department shall authorize examinations of 10applicants for original licensure as a Professional Geologist 11at such times and places as it may determine. The examination 12for licensure as a Licensed Professional Geologist shall be a 132-part examination, with one part fairly testing an 14applicant's knowledge of the fundamental theory and concepts 15of the science of geology, including subjects that are 16generally taught in geology curricula of accredited colleges 17and universities, and the other part testing the applicant's 18knowledge of the practical application and uses of the theory 19and science of geology. The 2 parts of the examination may be 20taken at separate times. 21    (b) Applicants for examinations shall pay, either to the 22Department or to the designated testing service, a fee 23covering the cost of providing the examination. Failure to 24appear for the examination on the scheduled date at the time 25and place specified after the application for examination has   SB2503 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1been received and acknowledged by the Department or the 2designated testing service shall result in forfeiture of the 3examination fee.4    (c) If the applicant neglects, fails, or refuses to take 5an examination or fails to pass an examination for a license 6under this Act within 3 years 6 years after filing an 7application, the application shall be denied. However, the 8applicant may thereafter submit a new application accompanied 9by the required fee. The applicant shall meet the requirements 10in force at the time of making the new application.11    (d) The Department may employ consultants for the purpose 12of preparing and conducting examinations.13    (e) The Department shall have the authority to adopt or 14recognize, in part or in whole, examinations prepared, 15administered, or graded by other organizations that are 16determined appropriate to measure the qualifications of an 17applicant for licensure as a Licensed Professional Geologist.18(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 19    (225 ILCS 745/50)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 50. Qualifications for licensure. 22    (a) The Department may issue a license to practice as a 23Licensed Professional Geologist to any applicant who meets the 24following qualifications:25        (1) The applicant has completed an application form   SB2503 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    and paid the required fees.2        (2) The applicant is of good ethical character, 3    including compliance with the Code of Professional Conduct 4    and Ethics under this Act, and has not committed any act or 5    offense in any jurisdiction that would constitute the 6    basis for disciplining a Licensed Professional Geologist 7    under this Act.8        (3) The applicant has earned a degree in geology or a 9    related science, as defined by rule, from an accredited 10    college or university, as established by rule, with a 11    minimum of 30 semester or 45 quarter hours of course 12    credits in geology, of which 24 semester or 36 quarter 13    hours are in upper level courses. The Department may, upon 14    the recommendation of the Board, allow the substitution of 15    appropriate experience as a geologist for prescribed 16    educational requirements as established by rule. 17        (4) The applicant has a documented record of a minimum 18    of 4 years of professional experience, obtained after 19    completion of the education requirements specified in this 20    Section, in geologic or directly related work, 21    demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume 22    responsible charge of such work upon licensure as a 23    Licensed Professional Geologist or such specialty of 24    professional geology that the Board may recommend and the 25    Department may recognize. The Department may require 26    evidence acceptable to it that up to 2 years of   SB2503 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    professional experience have been gained under the 2    supervision of a person licensed under this Act or similar 3    Acts in any other state, or under the supervision of 4    others who, in the opinion of the Department, are 5    qualified to have responsible charge of geological work 6    under this Act.7        (5) The applicant has passed both parts of the an 8    examination authorized by the Department for practice as a 9    Licensed Professional Geologist.10        (6) The applicant has complied with all other 11    requirements of this Act and rules established for the 12    implementation of this Act.13    (b) A license to practice as a Licensed Professional 14Geologist shall not be denied any applicant because of the 15applicant's race, religion, creed, national origin, political 16beliefs or activities, age, sex, sexual orientation, or 17physical impairment.18    (c) The Department may establish by rule an intern process 19to, in part, allow (1) a graduate who has earned a degree in 20geology from an accredited college or university in accordance 21with this Act or (2) a student in a degree program at an 22accredited college or university who has completed the 23necessary course requirements established in this Section to 24request to take one or both parts of the examination required 25by the Department without first submitting a formal 26application to the Department for licensure as a Licensed   SB2503 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1Professional Geologist. The Department may set by rule the 2criteria for the intern process, including, but not limited 3to, the educational requirements, exam requirements, 4experience requirements, remediation requirements, and any 5fees or applications required for the process. The Department 6may also set by rule provisions concerning disciplinary 7guidelines and the use of the title "intern" or "trainee" by a 8graduate or student who has passed the required examination. 9(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 10    (225 ILCS 745/54)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 54. Endorsement Previous qualification in other 13jurisdiction. The Department may, upon the recommendation of 14the Board, issue a license by endorsement to any applicant 15who, upon applying to the Department and remitting the 16required application fee, meets all of the following 17qualifications: 18        (1) The applicant holds an active, valid license to 19    practice professional geology in at least one jurisdiction 20    in the United States in which the current requirements for 21    licensure are substantially equivalent to or more 22    stringent than those required by this Act. 23        (2) The applicant is of good ethical character as 24    established by the Department in the Code of Professional 25    Conduct and Ethics under this Act and has not committed   SB2503 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    any act or offense in any jurisdiction that would 2    constitute the basis for discipline under this Act. 3        (3) The applicant has met any other qualifications 4    recommended to the Department by the Board.5    An applicant has 3 years from the date of application to 6complete the application process. If the process has not been 7completed within this 3-year 3 year period, then the 8application shall be denied, the fee shall be forfeited, and 9the applicant must re-apply and meet the requirements in 10effect at the time of re-application. 11(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 12    (225 ILCS 745/65)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 65. Expiration and renewal of license. The expiration 15date and renewal period for each license shall be set by rule. 16A Licensed Professional Geologist whose license has expired 17may reinstate the his or her license or enrollment at any time 18within 5 years after the expiration thereof, by making a 19renewal application and by paying the required fee. However, 20any Licensed Professional Geologist whose license expired 21while the Licensed Professional Geologist he or she was (i) on 22active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States or 23called into service or training by the State militia or (ii) in 24training or education under the supervision of the United 25States preliminary to induction into the military service, may   SB2503 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1have the his or her Licensed Professional Geologist license 2renewed, reinstated, or restored without paying any lapsed 3renewal fees if within 2 years after termination of the 4service, training, or education the Licensed Professional 5Geologist furnishes to the Department satisfactory evidence of 6the service, training, or education and that it has been 7terminated under honorable conditions.8    Any Licensed Professional Geologist whose license has 9expired for more than 5 years may have it restored by making 10application to the Department, paying the required fee, and 11filing acceptable proof of fitness to have the license 12restored. The proof may include sworn evidence certifying 13active practice in another jurisdiction. If the geologist has 14not practiced for 5 years or more, the Board shall determine by 15an evaluation program established by rule, whether that 16individual is fit to resume active status as a Licensed 17Professional Geologist. The Board may require the geologist to 18complete a period of evaluated professional experience and may 19require successful completion of an examination.20    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 21license of any person who fails to file a tax return, or to pay 22the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or to 23pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or interest, as 24required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 25Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of 26any such tax Act are satisfied.  SB2503 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 745/66 new)3    Sec. 66. Inactive status. A person licensed under this Act 4who notifies the Department in writing on forms prescribed by 5the Department may place the person's license on inactive 6status and shall be excused from the payment of renewal fees 7until the Department is notified in writing of the person's 8desire to resume active status.9    Any licensed geologist whose license is in inactive status 10shall not practice professional geology in this State. 11    (225 ILCS 745/75)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 75. Returned checks; fines. Any person who delivers a 14check or other payment to the Department that is returned to 15the Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which 16it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the 17amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines 18imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 19discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 20practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 21the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 22Department by certified check or money order within 30 23calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of 2430 calendar days from the date of the notification, the person   SB2503 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1has failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 2shall automatically terminate the license or deny the 3application, without a hearing. If, after termination or 4denial, the person seeks a license to practice as a Licensed 5Professional Geologist, the person he or she shall apply to 6the Department for restoration or issuance of the license and 7pay all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department 8may establish a fee for the processing of an application for 9restoration of a license to pay all expenses of processing 10this application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under 11this Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds 12that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 13burdensome.14(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 745/80)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 80. Disciplinary actions. 18    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 19revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 20disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 21deem appropriate, including fines not to exceed $10,000 for 22each violation, with regard to any license for any one or 23combination of the following:24        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 25    the Department.  SB2503 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (2) Violations of this Act, or of the rules 2    promulgated under this Act.3        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 4    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 5    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 6    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 7    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 8    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States: (i) 9    that is a felony or (ii) that is a misdemeanor, an 10    essential element of which is dishonesty, or that is 11    directly related to the practice of the profession.12        (4) Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 13    obtaining licensure or violating any provision of this Act 14    or the rules promulgated under this Act pertaining to 15    advertising.16        (5) Professional incompetence.17        (6) Malpractice.18        (7) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 19    any provision of this Act or rules promulgated under this 20    Act.21        (8) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 22    response to a written request made by the Department.23        (9) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 24    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 25    defraud, or harm the public.26        (10) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to   SB2503 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical 2    agent or drug that results in the inability to practice 3    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.4        (11) Discipline by another state, the District of 5    Columbia, a territory of the United States, or a foreign 6    nation, if at least one of the grounds for the discipline 7    is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth 8    in this Section.9        (12) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 10    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 11    association any fee, commission, rebate or other form of 12    compensation for professional services not actually or 13    personally rendered.14        (13) A finding by the Department that the licensee, 15    after having a his or her license placed on probationary 16    status, has violated the terms of probation.17        (14) Willfully making or filing false records or 18    reports in the person's his or her practice, including, 19    but not limited to, false records filed with State 20    agencies or departments.21        (15) Physical illness, including, but not limited to, 22    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 23    skill that results in the inability to practice the 24    profession with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.25        (16) Solicitation of professional services other than 26    permitted advertising.  SB2503 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1        (17) Conviction of or cash compromise of a charge or 2    violation of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 3    regulating narcotics.4        (18) Failure to (i) file a tax return, (ii) pay the 5    tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or 6    (iii) pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or 7    interest, as required by any tax Act administered by the 8    Illinois Department of Revenue, until the requirements of 9    that tax Act are satisfied.10        (19) Conviction by any court of competent 11    jurisdiction, either within or outside this State, of any 12    violation of any law governing the practice of 13    professional geology, if the Department determines, after 14    investigation, that the person has not been sufficiently 15    rehabilitated to warrant the public trust.16        (20) Gross, willful, or continued overcharging for 17    professional services, including filing false statements 18    for collection of fees for which services are not 19    rendered.20        (21) Practicing under a false or, except as provided 21    by law, an assumed name.22        (22) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for, or 23    procuring, a license to practice as a Licensed 24    Professional Geologist under this Act or in connection 25    with applying for renewal of a license under this Act.26        (23) Cheating on or attempting to subvert the   SB2503 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    licensing examination administered under this Act.2    (b) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 3is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 4provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 5Code operates as an automatic suspension. The suspension will 6end only upon a finding by a court that the licensee is no 7longer subject to the involuntary admission or judicial 8admission and issues an order so finding and discharging the 9licensee; and upon the recommendation of the Board to the 10Secretary that the licensee be allowed to resume the 11licensee's his or her practice.12    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1360 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 14or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 15the fine. 16(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 17    (225 ILCS 745/85)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 85. Injunctive action; cease and desist order. 20    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 21Director, in the name of the People of the State of Illinois, 22through the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the 23county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, may 24petition for an order enjoining the violation or for an order 25enforcing compliance with this Act. Upon the filing of a   SB2503 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1verified petition, the court with appropriate jurisdiction may 2issue a temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, 3and may preliminarily and permanently enjoin the violation. If 4it is established that the person has violated or is violating 5the injunction, the court may punish the offender for contempt 6of court. Proceedings under this Section are in addition to, 7and not in lieu of, all other remedies and penalties provided 8by this Act.9    (b) If any a person practices as a Licensed Professional 10Geologist or holds oneself himself or herself out as a 11Licensed Professional Geologist in Illinois, without being 12licensed to do so under this Act, then any Licensed 13Professional Geologist, interested party, or any person 14injured thereby may petition for relief as provided in 15subsection (a) of this Section.16    (c) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, a person 17violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 18rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 19be entered against that person. The rule shall clearly set 20forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall 21allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 22answer satisfactory to the Department. Failure to answer to 23the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to 24cease and desist to be issued.25(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.)   SB2503 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    (225 ILCS 745/90)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 90. Investigations; notice and hearing. The 4Department may investigate the actions of any applicant or of 5any person or persons rendering or offering to render 6geological services or any person holding or claiming to hold 7a license as a Licensed Professional Geologist. The Department 8shall, before revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 9reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 10Section 80 of this Act, at least 30 days before the date set 11for the hearing, (i) notify the accused in writing of the 12charges made and the time and place for the hearing on the 13charges, (ii) direct the accused him or her to file a written 14answer to the charges with the Board under oath within 20 days 15after the service on the accused him or her of the notice, and 16(iii) notify the accused that, if the accused he or she fails 17to answer, default will be taken against the accused him or 18her, and that the his or her license may be suspended, revoked, 19placed on probationary status, or other disciplinary action 20taken with regard to the license, including limiting the 21scope, nature, or extent of the accused's his or her practice, 22as the Department may consider proper. At the time and place 23fixed in the notice, the Board shall proceed to hear the 24charges and the parties or their counsel shall be accorded 25ample opportunity to present any pertinent statements, 26testimony, evidence, and arguments. The Board may continue the   SB2503 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1hearing from time to time. In case the person, after receiving 2the notice, fails to file an answer, the person's his or her 3license may, in the discretion of the Department, be 4suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or subject 5to any other disciplinary action the Department considers 6proper, including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 7person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 8hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 9grounds for that action under this Act. The written notice may 10be served by personal delivery or by certified mail or by email 11to the licensee's address of record or email address of 12record.13(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 745/110)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 110. Findings and recommendations. At the conclusion 17of the hearing, the Board shall present to the Secretary a 18written report of its findings of fact, conclusions of law, 19and recommendations. The report shall contain a finding 20whether or not the accused person violated this Act or its 21rules or failed to comply with the conditions required in this 22Act or its rules. The Board shall specify the nature of any 23violations or failure to comply and shall make its 24recommendations to the Secretary. In making recommendations 25for any disciplinary actions, the Board may take into   SB2503 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1consideration all facts and circumstances bearing upon the 2reasonableness of the conduct of the accused and the potential 3for future harm to the public, including, but not limited to, 4previous discipline of the accused by the Department, intent, 5degree of harm to the public and likelihood of harm in the 6future, any restitution made by the accused, and whether the 7incident or incidents contained in the complaint appear to be 8isolated or represent a continuing pattern of conduct. In 9making its recommendations for discipline, the Board shall 10endeavor to ensure that the severity of the discipline 11recommended is reasonably related to the severity of the 12violation.13    The report of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and 14recommendation of the Board shall be the basis for the 15Department's order refusing to issue, restore, or renew a 16person's license to practice as a Licensed Professional 17Geologist, or otherwise disciplining a licensee. If the 18Secretary disagrees with the recommendations of the Board, the 19Secretary may issue an order in contravention of the Board 20recommendations. The Secretary shall provide a written report 21to the Board on any disagreement and shall specify the reasons 22for the action in the final order. The finding is not 23admissible in evidence against the person in a criminal 24prosecution brought for a violation of this Act, but the 25hearing and finding are not a bar to a criminal prosecution 26brought for a violation of this Act.  SB2503 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 745/120)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 120. Secretary; rehearing. Whenever the Secretary 5believes that justice has not been done in the revocation, 6suspension, or refusal to issue, restore, or renew a person's 7license to practice as a Licensed Professional Geologist, or 8other discipline of an applicant or licensee, the Secretary he 9or she may order a rehearing by the same or other examiners.10(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 745/125)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 125. Appointment of a hearing officer. The Secretary 14has the authority to appoint any attorney licensed to practice 15law in the State of Illinois to serve as the hearing officer in 16any action for refusal to issue, restore, or renew a person's 17license to practice as a Licensed Professional Geologist or to 18discipline a licensee. The hearing officer has full authority 19to conduct the hearing. Members of the Board may attend each 20hearing. The hearing officer shall report his or her findings 21of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations to the Board 22and the Secretary. The Board shall have 60 calendar days from 23receipt of the report to review the report of the hearing 24officer and present its findings of fact, conclusions of law,   SB2503 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1and recommendations to the Secretary. If the Board does not 2present its report within the 60-day period, the Secretary may 3issue an order based on the report of the hearing officer. If 4the Secretary disagrees with the recommendation of the Board 5or of the hearing officer, the Secretary may issue an order in 6contravention of the recommendation. The Secretary shall 7promptly provide a written report to the Board on any 8deviation, and shall specify the reasons for the action in the 9final order.10(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 745/140)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 140. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 14suspension of a person's license to practice as a Licensed 15Professional Geologist, the licensee shall immediately 16surrender the person's his or her license to the Department 17and the licensee's name and address shall be added to the list 18of individuals whose licenses have been revoked, suspended, or 19denied renewal for cause. If the licensee fails to surrender 20the his or her license, the Department has the right to seize 21the license.22(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 23    (225 ILCS 745/160)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2503 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    Sec. 160. Violations. 2    (a) Using or attempting to use an expired license is a 3Class A misdemeanor.4    (b) Each of the following acts is a Class A misdemeanor for 5the first offense and a Class 4 felony for a second or 6subsequent offense:7        (1) A violation of any provision of this Act or its 8    rules, except as noted in subsection (a) of this Section.9        (2) The making of any willfully wilfully false oath or 10    affirmation in any matter or proceeding where an oath or 11    affirmation is required by this Act.12        (3) Using or attempting to use an inactive, suspended, 13    or revoked license or the license or seal of another, or 14    impersonating another licensee, or practicing geology as a 15    Licensed Professional Geologist in Illinois while one's 16    license is inactive, suspended, or revoked.17        (4) The practice, attempt to practice, or offer to 18    practice professional geology in Illinois without a 19    license as a Licensed Professional Geologist. Each day of 20    practicing professional geology or attempting to practice 21    professional geology, and each instance of offering to 22    practice professional geology, without a license as a 23    Licensed Professional Geologist constitutes a separate 24    offense.25        (5) Advertising or displaying any sign or card or 26    other device that might indicate to the public that the   SB2503 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1    person or entity is entitled to practice as a Licensed 2    Professional Geologist, unless that person holds an active 3    license as a Licensed Professional Geologist in the State 4    of Illinois.5        (6) Fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment in 6    applying for or procuring a license under this Act, or in 7    connection with applying for the renewal of a license 8    under this Act Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license 9    by fraud.10        (7) The inability to practice with reasonable 11    judgment, skill, or safety as a result of habitual or 12    excessive use or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, 13    stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug.14        (8) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 15    unprofessional conduct of a nature likely to deceive, 16    defraud, or harm the public.17        (9) A violation of any provision of this Act or any 18    rules adopted under this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 20    (225 ILCS 745/180)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 180. Confidentiality. All information collected by 23the Department in the course of an examination or 24investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 25limited to, any complaint against a licensee filed with the   SB2503 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 10739 AAS 20818 b1Department and information collected to investigate any such 2complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 3Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department shall 4not disclose the information to anyone other than law 5enforcement officials, regulatory agencies that have an 6appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 7Secretary, or a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the 8Department. Information and documents disclosed to a federal, 9State, county, or local law enforcement agency or regulatory 10agency shall not be disclosed by the agency for any purpose to 11any other agency or person. A formal complaint filed against a 12licensee by the Department or any order issued by the 13Department against a licensee or applicant shall be a public 14record, except as otherwise prohibited by law.15(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.